Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.100

State higher education administrative procedure act not to affect.

Contracts or agreements, or any provision thereof entered into between boards of trustees and employees organizations pursuant to this chapter shall not be affected by or be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 9.]